California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a former board member’s or former employee’s service ends at the completion of the evaluation period, or the former board member’s or former employee’s last day of service with MTA, whichever occurs first.

(c) For purposes of paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a), a former board member’s or former employee’s service ends at the completion of the contract term, or the former board member’s or former employee’s last day of service with MTA, whichever occurs first. 

(d) The inspector general appointed pursuant to Section 130051.28 may enforce this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 5.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.21.

The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission and the Southern California Rapid Transit District shall each cause a supplemental independent fiscal audit to be conducted for the period beginning July 1, 1992, and ending March 30, 1993, for the purpose of determining the financial condition of each agency prior to the abolishment of those agencies pursuant to Section 130051.13. Thereafter, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall cause an independent fiscal audit of the authority to be conducted annually and shall consider the results of the audit at a duly noticed public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 586, Sec. 8.   Effective September 2, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.22.

(a) The authority may establish and maintain a prequalification program for bidders on contracts not covered by subdivision (b).

(b) On public projects, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002 of the Public Contract Code, the authority shall require, at a minimum, that prospective bidders for a construction contract complete and submit to the authority a prequalification standardized questionnaire and financial statement in a form specified by the authority, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20101 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 703, Sec. 3.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.23.

Whenever the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority by resolution determines that any record, map, book, or paper in the possession of the authority or any officer or employee thereof is of no further value to the authority, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition. Documents significant to the activities of the authority, including, but not limited to, board and committee agendas, incoming and outgoing correspondence, and contractual documents, shall be microfilmed or otherwise preserved prior to the sale, destruction, or other disposition of the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.24.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) The “authority” is the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(2) A “transportation zone” is a public agency or a public benefit corporation of which public agencies are the sole members established on or after January 1, 1999, that assumes any of the operating responsibilities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 130051.11 on or after that date, regardless of whether the transportation zone is an included municipal operator, as defined in Section 99207, or an included transit district, as defined in Section 99208.

(b) (1) Except as authorized under paragraph (2), a transportation zone shall assume and be bound by the terms and conditions of employment set forth in any collective bargaining agreements between the authority and any labor organizations affected by the creation of the transportation zone as well as the duties, obligations, and liabilities arising from, or relating to, labor obligations imposed by state or federal law upon the authority.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the authority is engaged in collective bargaining with labor organizations representing employees who are subject to transfer to the transportation zone between the date of approval of the transportation zone and the date of the transfer of service to the transportation zone, the authority may consult with the transportation zone regarding matters within the scope of labor representation.

(c) (1) For a period of four years, commencing with the date of transfer of service by the authority to the transportation zone, or at the expiration date of any collective bargaining agreement that is in effect during that four-year period, whichever is later, employees of the transportation zone, together with like employees of the authority, shall constitute appropriate collective bargaining units. However, the transportation zone may be a separate employer for other purposes.

(2) Upon expiration of the period described in paragraph (1), employees of the transportation zone, at the option of the transportation zone, may constitute appropriate collective bargaining units that are independent of the collective bargaining units of the authority.

(3) If independent bargaining units are established as authorized under paragraph (2), the transportation zone may enter into agreements with labor organizations as a separate employer, regarding wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment.

(4) The transportation zone shall maintain single employer collective bargaining units for transportation operations and maintenance employees. Those bargaining units shall contain classifications for employees that are identical to those that existed for the joint collective bargaining units of the authority and the transportation zone under paragraph (1), unless modified by mutual agreement between the transportation zone and the affected labor organizations.

(d) (1) The authority shall retain, for the period described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the power of final approval of labor contracts negotiated by it and a transportation zone with those labor organizations representing collective bargaining units consisting of both employees of the authority and the employees of the transportation zone. However, the authority may not grant any final approval of a labor agreement unless it has first consulted with the transportation zone.

(2) Upon expiration of the period described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the authority shall have no final approval power over any labor contract negotiated between a transportation zone and a labor organization representing the employees of the transportation zone.

(e) (1) A transportation zone shall maintain, as a cosponsor with the authority, any retirement system established and maintained under subdivision (b) of Section 130110, until participation in the retirement system or retirement benefits are modified under the collective bargaining process.

(2) The transportation zone may appoint at least one member to the retirement board of the retirement system. If the size of the board is increased pursuant to this section, an equivalent number of representatives of the labor organization representing the employees shall be appointed to the board to ensure that the board maintains an equal number of employer and labor organization members.

(3) Prior to the transfer of any service to a transportation zone, the plan administrator for the retirement system shall permit the transportation zone to perform an actuarial financial examination of the assets and liabilities of the retirement system and the benefits accrued under it.

(4) The liability of the transportation zone for obligations under the retirement system shall be limited to benefits accruing to employees of the transportation zone.

(f) (1) The transportation zone shall maintain the health care provisions contained in any assumed collective bargaining agreement, until those provisions are modified through the collective bargaining process.

(2) The transportation zone may not be held liable for financial obligations to any health care provider that arose prior to the direct transfer of employees from the authority to the transportation zone.

(g) Labor relations in a transportation zone shall be governed under Article 10 (commencing with Section 30750) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 10, except that whenever a duty or power is imposed upon or granted to the authority under those provisions, the duty or power, for the purposes of this section, shall be deemed to be imposed upon or granted to the transportation zone as well as the authority.

(h) Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation zone from contracting for managerial services that are not provided by any classification of any bargaining unit.

(i) A transportation zone is not an organizational unit of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1080, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.25.

(a) For the purpose of this section, “recordable injury” means any injury requiring treatment beyond simple first aid.

(b) A construction firm that contracts with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall report total recordable injuries to the authority on a monthly basis.

(c) The authority shall annually determine if the number of recordable injuries reported to the authority during the preceding calendar year exceeded the national average of similar injuries as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the most recent published year. If the authority determines that the number of recordable injuries reported to the authority during the preceding calendar year exceeded the national average, the authority shall not base any safety bonus program for contractors on injuries that result in lost time, and shall base such a program on the overall rate of recordable injuries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 657, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.28.

(a) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall appoint an inspector general to a term of office of four years. The inspector general shall be removed from office only if either or both of the following occur:

(1) A two-thirds majority of the members of the authority votes for removal.

(2) The inspector general violates a federal or state law or regulation, a local ordinance, or a policy or practice of the authority, relative to ethical practices, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of gifts or contributions.

(b) The inspector general shall, at a noticed public hearing of the authority, report quarterly on the expenditures of the authority for travel, meals and refreshments, private club dues, membership fees and other charges, and any other expenditures which are specified by the authority.

(c) Any investigatory file compiled by the inspector general is an investigatory file compiled by a local law enforcement agency subject to disclosure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 406.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

130052.

The Orange County Transportation Commission shall be known as the Orange County Transportation Authority and shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of 18 members appointed as follows:

(a) Five members of the Orange County Board of Supervisors appointed by that board. Terms of office of the five members of the board of supervisors shall be determined by the board of supervisors. A board of supervisors member’s term shall cease if he or she no longer serves as a member of the board of supervisors.

(b) (1) (A) Five city members, with one from each of the five supervisorial districts, elected by the Orange County City Selection Committee members within each supervisorial district on a population-weighted voting basis.

(B) Five city members, with one from each of the five supervisorial districts, elected on a “one city, one vote” basis by the Orange County City Selection Committee members within each supervisorial district.

(2) A city that is within more than one supervisorial district shall be considered part of the district where the highest percentage of the city’s population resides. Under this circumstance, the entire city’s population shall be used for population-weighted voting purposes. Each city member shall be a mayor or a city council member serving within the county. Terms of office of each city member shall be determined by the Orange County City Selection Committee. A city member’s term shall cease if he or she no longer serves as a member of a city council or as the mayor of a city. 

(3) A city member serving on the authority on the effective date of the act amending this section in the 2003–04 Regular Session shall continue to serve until the earliest of either the expiration of his or her term or until he or she no longer serves as a mayor or member of a city council.

(c) Two public members appointed by a majority vote of the other 15 voting members of the authority. Each public member shall be a resident of Orange County who is not then serving, and has not within the last four years served, as an elected official of a city within the county, as an elected official of any agency or special district within Orange County, or as an elected official of the county. Each public member shall serve for a term of four years.

(d) The Director of Transportation, District 12, who shall be appointed by the Governor as a nonvoting member. The member shall serve for a term of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

130052.1.

The members of the Orange County Transportation Authority, comprised as specified by Section 130052, shall serve as the governing body of the Orange County Service Authority for Freeway Emergencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 983, Sec. 5.   Operative December 1, 1991, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

130052.2.

Until July 1, 1996, any included municipal operator within the jurisdiction of the Orange County Transportation Authority shall annually be allocated a level of funding pursuant to the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10) which is not less than the amount allocated to that operator during the 1989–90 fiscal year adjusted by an amount equal to the previous year’s allocation multiplied by the Los Angeles-Anaheim-Riverside Consumer Price Index, if the apportionment under Section 99231 is not exceeded, and the operator complies with the expenditure limit prescribed by Section 99268.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 983, Sec. 6.   Operative December 1, 1991, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

130052.3.

(a) The Orange County Transportation Commission, the Orange County Transit District, the Orange County Service Authority for Freeway Emergencies, and the Orange County Consolidated Transportation Services Agency shall jointly develop a comprehensive plan for consolidation of the functions of these agencies. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) An institutional structure that provides for the consolidation of all functions of the agencies within a unified management structure responsible to a single policy board.

(2) A staffing plan that defines the personnel needs of the consolidated agencies.

(3) A financial plan that includes an estimate of the revenues available to the consolidated agencies, related restrictions or requirements, and an estimate of the expenditures under the consolidation plan.

(4) Recommendations for legislation necessary to implement the plan.

(b) The plan shall be approved by the Orange County Transportation Commission and the Board of Directors of the Orange County Transit District and shall be transmitted to the Legislature, the Governor, and the Controller on or before December 1, 1991.

(c) If the plan is not submitted by December 1, 1991, the Controller shall, during the 1992–93 fiscal year, withhold payments pursuant to Sections 2104, 2105, 2106, and 2107 of the Streets and Highways Code to every city in Orange County, and the County of Orange.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the Orange County Transportation Commission, the Orange County Transit District, the Orange County Service Authority for Freeway Emergencies, or the Orange County Consolidated Transportation Services Agency, pursuant to any authority which each respective agency possessed on January 1, 1991, from implementing all or part of the plan prior to its receipt by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 983, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

130053.

The Riverside County Transportation Commission shall consist of the following regular members:

(a) Five members of the Riverside County Board of Supervisors.

(b) One member from each incorporated city in Riverside County, each of whom shall be a mayor or city council member.

(c) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

130053.5.

(a) The Riverside County Board of Supervisors shall establish a procedure by which a member of that board may appoint an alternate member of the board of supervisors to represent the member for one meeting of the Riverside County Transportation Commission. Notice of the alternate appointment shall be made in writing to the clerk of the commission 24 hours prior to the meeting.

(b) Each incorporated city in Riverside County shall appoint one alternate member to the commission who shall represent the regular member of the commission who serves on behalf of the city, if the regular member is not in attendance at a meeting. Notice of the alternate appointment shall be made in writing to the clerk of the commission 24 hours prior to the meeting. If an incorporated city appoints an alternate member, the alternate member shall be either the mayor or a city council member of that incorporated city.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 387, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

130053.7.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), each regular member of the Riverside County Transportation Commission, or an alternate member acting in the place of a regular member pursuant to Section 130053.5, shall have one vote at meetings of the commission.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any member of the commission, immediately after a vote of the commission in accordance with subdivision (a), may call for a weighted vote. For an item to be passed by weighted vote, all of the following requirements shall be met:

(1) The item shall be approved by a majority of the commission members present at the meeting who represent the board of supervisors, who each shall have one vote.

(2) The item shall be approved by a majority of the commission members present at the meeting who represent cities in Riverside County, who each shall have one vote.

(3) The item shall be approved by commission members present at the meeting who represent cities in Riverside County representing a majority of the population of the county living in incorporated areas. For the purpose of this paragraph, each regular commission member at the meeting who represents a city in Riverside County shall be assigned votes based on the percentage of the population of incorporated areas of Riverside County represented by that member in relation to the total population of incorporated areas of Riverside County represented at the meeting. Population data shall be determined through Department of Finance estimates, adjusted annually.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 130102, a quorum of the Riverside County Transportation Commission shall be a majority of the total voting membership of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 387, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

130054.1.

The Ventura County Transportation Commission shall consist of the following members:

(a) Five members of the Ventura County Board of Supervisors.

(b) One member from each incorporated city within Ventura County who shall be the mayor of the city or a member of its city council. The term of a member under this subdivision terminates when he or she ceases to hold that office or when replaced by the city council.

(c) One citizen member appointed by the Ventura County Board of Supervisors, who shall not be an elected official, but who shall be a resident of Ventura County.

(d) One citizen member appointed by the Ventura County City Selection Committee, who shall not be an elected official, but who shall be a resident of Ventura County.

(e) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

130054.8.

The Governor shall appoint a nonvoting member to each of the commissions to represent the interest of state.

The appointees shall serve terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

No individual shall serve as a nonvoting member more than two terms on a commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 904, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130055.

The commissions shall merge with, or otherwise join, any statutorily created multifunctional regional government organization, if it has transportation planning and programming responsibilities as specified in Article 5 (commencing with Section 130300) of Chapter 4, within one year of creation of such an organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130056.

The commissions shall rely to the maximum extent possible on existing state, regional, and local transportation planning and programming data and expertise, rather than on a large duplicative commission staff and set of plans.

The Legislature envisions the development of a small, but very capable, core staff able to provide the commissions with an objective analysis of the various options relative to plans and proposed projects of the regional and local transportation agencies and operators, and then translate those options into a short-range transportation improvement program to be developed and approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 130303 in accordance with decisions made by the commissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130057.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, after the development and approval of the short-range transportation improvement program pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 130303, the transportation agencies responsible for the implementation of the program shall be granted discretion on how to best implement the program. Any changes made in the program by such an agency in its implementation shall be consistent with the purposes of the program, and the commission shall be immediately notified of such changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130058.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, working through the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, the four commissions be encouraged to develop joint powers agreements or other contractual arrangements between themselves in the development of transportation facilities or for the provision of transportation services where the commissions feel such arrangements are in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130059.

The multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall convene at least two meetings annually of representatives from each of the four commissions, the agency, and the Department of Transportation for the following purposes:

(a) To review and discuss the near-term transportation improvement programs prior to adoption by the commissions.

(b) To review and discuss the regional transportation plan prior to adoption by the agency pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 65080) of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(c) To consider progress in the development of a regionwide and unified public transit system.

(d) To review and discuss any other matter of mutual concern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [130100. - 130110.]

130100.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 130052, each commission at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January or at such other date as the commission may determine, shall elect a chairperson from its members who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in his or her absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting, shall have all of the authority of the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 904, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

130101.

The commission shall establish rules for its proceedings consistent with the law of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130102.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the commission shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 3.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130103.

The acts of the commission shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130104.

(a) All meetings of the commission shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) All meetings of the citizens’ advisory committee and technical advisory committee shall be held pursuant to Section 54952.3 of the Government Code, and no other provision of the Ralph M. Brown Act shall apply to meetings of these committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 950.)
-------------------------------------------

130105.

The commission shall:

(a) Adopt an annual budget and fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which shall prescribe the powers and duties of commission officers, the method of appointment of commission employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the commission.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the commission to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Appoint, not later than July 1, 1977, a citizens’ advisory committee, which membership shall reflect a broad spectrum of interests and all geographic areas of the county. Members of the staff of the commission, as determined by the commission, shall be available to aid the citizens’ advisory committee in its work.

(e) Appoint a technical advisory committee of representatives from all of the transit operators, all of the cities and the county, and the Department of Transportation, and such other advisory committees it deems necessary.

(f) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130106.

Notice of time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and shall be published not later than the 15th day prior to the date of the hearing.

The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130107.

The commission shall appoint a full-time executive director who shall act for the commission under its direction.

The commission may appoint such officers as it deems necessary to carry out its duties and functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130108.

(a) Each member of a commission may be compensated at a rate not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for any day attending to the business of the commission, but not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) in any month, and the necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as authorized by the commission. Members of the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall be compensated pursuant to this subdivision. Members of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall be compensated pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Each member of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation
 Authority shall be compensated at a rate not exceeding one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) for any day attending to the business of the authority, but not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month, and other expenses which are directly related to the performance of duties as authorized by the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 5.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130108.5.

Notwithstanding Section 130108, the Board of Directors of the Orange County Transportation Authority may allow members of the board necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in performance of duties authorized by the board and may allow members per diem compensation at the maximum rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per day, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in any calendar month, for attending board meetings and for performance of any other services for the authority as authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

130109.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the commission shall enter into a contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and the board shall enter into that contract, to include all of the employees of the commission into that retirement system, and the employees shall be entitled to substantially similar health benefits as are state employees pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of providing retirement benefits, the commission may contract with the retirement system that the employees of the county in which the commission is located are members of in lieu of contracting with the board.

(c) Each person employed by the Orange County Transportation Commission on January 1, 1992, may, no later than February 1, 1992, elect to either remain a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or become a member of the Orange County Employees Retirement System. All persons who become employed by the commission after February 1, 1991, shall be members of the Orange County Employees Retirement System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 37.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

130109.1.

Upon creation of the Ventura County Transportation Commission, and on the effective date of a contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, existing balances in the Ventura County Association of Governments Account in the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund shall be transferred to the commission’s account in that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1136, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

130110.

(a) For employees of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority not in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization, the authority shall establish retirement benefits pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 30400) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 30430) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 10.

(b) Retirement benefits for employees of the authority and any organizational unit of the authority in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 30450) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 10.

(c) Retirement benefits for employees of the authority and any organizational unit of the authority in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization that was created on or after January 1, 1999, for the purpose of representing managerial employees or supervisorial employees, shall be established pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between the authority or any organizational unit of the authority and that labor organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1080, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions [130200. - 130455.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Powers [130200. - 130203.]

130200.

The commission has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130201.

The commission may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130202.

All claims for money or damages against the commission are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130203.

Whenever a commission, by resolution, determines that any record, map, book, paper, or other document of the commission in the possession of the commission or any officer or employee for 10 years or more is of no further use or value to the commission, the commission may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1172, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [130220. - 130246.]

130220.

The commission may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130220.5.

(a) The commission has the power of eminent domain to take any property necessary, incidental, or convenient to the exercise of its powers pursuant to this division.

(b) The commission may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property outside its territorial limits for environmental mitigation purposes only if otherwise authorized by law and only to the extent so authorized, and only with the consent of the board of supervisors of the county in which the mitigation will occur.

(c) No action to acquire property by eminent domain within any incorporated city or within the unincorporated area of any county shall be commenced unless written notice is given to the legislative body of the affected city or county, as the case may be, in accordance with Section 1245.235 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and the affected city or county, as the case may be, shall have the same rights to a hearing before the commission as a person to whom notice is otherwise required to be given under that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

130221.

The commission may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency (including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, or any transit district, county, or city), or with any person upon such terms and conditions as the commission finds is in its best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130231.

(a) The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission is authorized to impose a transactions and use tax within the County of Los Angeles pursuant to the approval by the voters of the commission’s Ordinance No. 16 in 1980 and its Ordinance No. 49 in 1990, and has the authority and power vested in the Southern California Rapid Transit District to plan, design, and construct an exclusive public mass transit guideway system in the County of Los Angeles, including, but not limited to, Article 5 (commencing with Section 30630 of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 11). 

(b) The commission shall conform to this article in letting contracts for the construction of that system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 159, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

130232.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (f) and (g), purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, and the construction of all facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation. The publication shall be made at least 10 days before the date for the receipt of the bids. The commission, at its discretion, may reject any and all bids and readvertise.

(b) Except as provided for in subdivisions (f) and (g), whenever the expected expenditure required exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000),
 but not twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the commission shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared.

(c) Where the expenditure required by the bid price is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the executive director may act for the commission.

(d) All bids for construction work submitted pursuant to this section shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the commission.

(3) A certified check made
 payable to the commission.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the commission.

(e) Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the commission beyond 60 days from the date that the award was made.

(f) The following provisions apply only to the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority:
